Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.914

Students with disabilities—Accommodation.

Reasonable accommodation for students with disabilities shall be provided as appropriate for all aspects of college and university life, including but not limited to: Recruitment, the application process, enrollment, registration, financial aid, coursework, research, academic counseling, housing programs owned or operated by the institution of higher education, and nonacademic programs and services.

[ 1994 c 105 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—1994 c 105: See note following RCW 28B.10.910.